Hawaii statutes.
[§431:2D-110] Fines and penalties.
(a) Fines and penalties levied pursuant to this article or other provisions of
this chapter shall be consistent, reasonable, and justified.

(b) The commissioner shall take into
consideration actions taken by insurers that maintain membership in
best-practice organizations that exist to promote high ethical standards of
conduct in the marketplace, and insurers that self-assess, self-report, and
remediate problems detected to mitigate fines levied pursuant to this article.
[L 2007, c 227, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next